Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1708XS (12) 91 dg/jh S.F. 207 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âCovered platformâ means a commercial entity for which it 3 is in the regular course of the trade or business of the entity 4 to create, host, or make available, on the internet, obscene 5 material provided by the entity, a user, or other information 6 content provider. 7 2. âIdentifying informationâ means any representation of 8 information that permits the identity of an individual to whom 9 the information applies to be reasonably inferred by either 10 direct or indirect means. 11 3. âInformation content providerâ means the same as defined 12 in 47 U.S.C. Â§230. 13 4. âInteractive computer serviceâ means the same as defined 14 in 47 U.S.C. Â§230. 15 5. âObscene materialâ means the same as defined in section 16 728.1. 17 6. âProviderâ means an internet service provider, cloud 18 service provider, wireless service provider, internet search 19 engine, or an affiliate or subsidiary of an internet service 20 provider, cloud service provider, wireless service provider, or 21 internet search engine. 22 7. âReasonable age verificationâ means verifying the age of 23 an individual by using any of the following methods: 24 a. Government-issued identification. 25 b. Financial documents or other documents that are reliable 26 proxies for age. 27 c. Any other commercially reasonable and reliable method. 28 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554I.2 Publication and distribution 29 of obscene material on the internet ââ age verification ââ civil 30 liability. 31 1. A covered platform shall be held liable if the covered 32 platform fails to perform reasonable age verification of 33 individuals attempting to access obscene material published 34 or distributed by the covered platform and the failure allows 35 -1- LSB 1708XS (12) 91 dg/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 207 access by a minor to the obscene material. 1 2. Reasonable age verification required under subsection 1 2 may be conducted by a third party and may employ cryptographic 3 techniques such as zero knowledge proofs to preserve anonymity 4 and protect privacy. 5 3. a. A covered platform or third party that performs the 6 reasonable age verification required under subsection 1 shall 7 not retain an individualâs identifying information after the 8 covered platform or third party completes the individualâs 9 reasonable age verification. 10 b. A covered platform or third party that performs the 11 reasonable age verification required under subsection 1 shall 12 not distribute, sell, or otherwise disseminate an individualâs 13 identifying information obtained through the covered platformâs 14 or third partyâs performance of reasonable age verification. 15 4. A covered platform that violates subsection 1 shall be 16 subject to punitive damages resulting from the violation, plus 17 reasonable attorney fees and costs. Punitive damages shall not 18 exceed triple the aggregate amount of a plaintiffâs reasonable 19 attorney fees and costs. 20 5. A covered platform or third party that violates 21 subsection 3 shall be subject to punitive damages and actual 22 damages resulting from the violation, plus reasonable attorney 23 fees and costs. Punitive damages shall not exceed triple the 24 aggregate amount of a plaintiffâs reasonable attorney fees and 25 costs. 26 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554I.3 Limitations on liability. 27 1. a. This chapter shall not be construed to impose 28 liability on a user of an interactive computer service on the 29 internet. 30 b. This chapter shall not be construed to impose liability 31 on a provider solely for providing access or connection to a 32 covered platform, or to obscene material on an internet site 33 or in a facility, system, or network not under the providerâs 34 control to the extent the provider is not responsible for 35 -2- LSB 1708XS (12) 91 dg/jh 2/ 4 S.F. 207 the creation of the obscene material. For purposes of this 1 paragraph, âaccess or connectionâ includes but is not limited to 2 transmitting, downloading, providing intermediate storage for, 3 and providing access software for data. 4 2. The requirements of this chapter shall be enforced 5 exclusively through private civil actions. No direct or 6 indirect enforcement of this chapter may be taken or threatened 7 by the state or any political subdivision thereof. 8